Hawaii, session 2025, GM1317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
1 SECTION 1. The legislature finds that for fiscal year
2 2025, the executive branch had requested about $3,600,000,000 in
3 funding for more than forty-seven thousand permanent and three
4 thousand six hundred temporary authorized positions. The amount
5 requested accounted for more than twenty per cent of all
6 authorized funds in fiscal year 2025.
7 The legislature further finds that there has been a high
8 vacancy rate in public employment positions and funds
9 appropriated for these positions are either transferred or used
. 10 for purposes that are not consistent with the purpose for which
11 the appropriation was authorized. A vacancy report from
12 December 2024 from the department of human resources development
13 identified four thousand eighty-five vacancies, or about twenty-
14 four per cent of civil service positions, in the State.
15 The purpose of this Act is to increase legislative
16 oversight to ensure that funds appropriated by the legislature
17 are used for their intended purpose by requiring an annual
2025-3444 HB1424 CDl HMSO

Page 2
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
1 report to the legislature on the transfer of funds originally
2 appropriated for positions but used for operating expenses, and
3 vice versa.
4 SECTION 2. Chapter 37, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended
5 by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to
6 read as follows:
7 "§37- Transfers of funds; positions; operating
8 expenses; report. The director of finance shall submit an
9 annual report to the legislature no later than sixty days after
10 the end of the fiscal year that shall, at minimum:
11 (1) Identify all positions funded by appropriations
12 intended for operating expenses including but not
13 limited to equipment and motor vehicles;
14 (2) Identify operating expenses funded by appropriations
15 intended for filling positions during the preceding
16 fiscal year; and
17 (3) Include, if applicable, a list of departments that
18 failed to provide information necessary to complete
19 the report."
20 SECTION 3. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-3444 HB1424 CDl HMSO 2
iiiiHiinniiiuiiiiiinii

Page 3 1424
H.B. NO
i
W
d
Q
Q
Q
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3444 HB1424 CDl HMSO
3
UimillllllllllHil!

1424
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 25th day of June , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1424, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1424, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘I
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of HawaiT, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate
164